Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
Number of Reviews
26

Author
Alex Bryson
Review: The Ice Storm (1997)
Starring: Kevin Kline, Joan Allen, Sigourney Weaver, Christina Ricci,
Tobey Maguire, Henry Czerny, Adam Hann-Byrd, Jamey Sheridan, David
Krumholtz, Elijah Wood
Ang Lee ventures into new territory in "The Ice Storm" - 70s America.
At least I thought it was new, until about two minutes in a character
makes a speech about what families are like ("personal negative
matter" apparently). That's OK by me though - Lee is the undisputed
master of this type of film-making, as he showed in "The Wedding
Banquet" and more recently "Sense and Sensibility".
Something is badly wrong in the well-heeled suburbia of New Canaan,
Connecticut. It isn't the interior decor, or the hideous shirts and
flared trousers - the malaise is deeper. Fortunately the director
realises that, and although there are a few jokes at the expense of
waterbeds he cuts straight to the deeply troubled relationships of the
inhabitants.
"The Ice Storm" is about two families: that of Joan Allen and Kevin
Kline, and Sigourney Weaver and Jamey Sheridan. It is a period study
of the era where the experiments of the late sixties had seeped into
the middle-aged middle-class consciousness, wreaking havoc on their
respectable lives, and changing the face of their society. Ben Hood
(Kline) is having an affair with neighbour Janey Carver (Weaver). His
daughter is experimenting with sex with her two sons. Elena, Ben's
wife, is uneasy, sensing his betrayal, and is meanwhile preyed on by
seedy clergyman Michael Cumpsty. Paul Hood (Tobey Maguire), the
insightful narrator has his sights set on a vacuous rich girl after
she spouts about existentialism.
The film is played out at dinner parties and "key" parties, and as the
story unfolds to its climax the ice storm of the title rages outside.
Ice is big in the movie, like the pressure on its characters to find
direction and meaning in the inhospitable climate of the day. Their
notions seem ridiculous, but Lee manages to retain our sympathy for
them, no matter how screwed up they are. They struggle with the
consequences of the upheaval, seeking emotional satisfaction: the
adolescent Paul seems to have the profoundest understanding, and that
comes from a Fantastic Four comic book. A lack of connection between
them has deadened their lives like the fury of the elements outside -
one scene shows Kline bored out of his skull in a board meeting, yet
he cannot communicate his frustration to either his wife or Janey, who
seeks only an "explicitly sexual relationship". Elena attempts to
block out the pressures and turns towards the artefacts of the
seventies like cultish religion and group marriage therapy. Even she
succumbs to quite possibly the most unerotic extra-marital love scene
ever filmed.
All the while the children are on a journey of discovery themselves:
Wendy, the independent daughter of the Hood family (played
marvellously by Christina Ricci) threatens the remaining order by
exposing herself to Sandy (Sigourney Weaver's reprimand speech about
coming of age rituals in "Samoa and other developing nations" is
particularly acute). In another scene she and Mikey fumble as she
wears a rubber Nixon mask - a disturbing image. The seventies are
evoked through this listless search for something and the bizarre
solutions that were offered. With their partner swapping and gullible
self-help philosophies, their need for emotional support, the adults
attempt to play the children, whilst the younger generation attempt to
find their way in the adult world.
The forces at play on these people are like the ice: ice so powerful
that it can bend iron lamps and fell trees: such an immense force that
it will crush anything it forms on: there is a sense that something
terrible will happen throughout - images like Mikey jumping up and
down on a frozen diving board, or Sandy playing with explosives. The
tragedy of these battered relationships is clear right from the
beginning: the families are splintered by straining marriages and
generation difference, but ultimately tragedy brings them together,
the ice storm uses up its energy and calm is restored: and in the bare
new light emerges understanding.

Author
Kristian Lin
I think Woody Allen started this.  THE ICE STORM is the latest in a
tradition of movies depicting sexually confused, emotionally repressed,
dysfunctional suburban WASP families who live in oh-so-tastefully
decorated houses and are fatally unable to relate to each other.  It's a
relatively new tradition; it couldn't have arrived without the changing
moral climate and the political and social unrest that the 1960s and
'70s brought to America.  The changes in society coincided with changes
in American filmmaking, as the studios collapsed and independent
filmmakers were now free to take a hard look at the nuclear family's
disintegration.  Woody Allen's subjects in INTERIORS (1978) may have
been Manhattanites and not suburbanites, but he seems to have been ahead
of the curve.  Two years later, ORDINARY PEOPLE (1980) snagged great
reviews and an Academy Award for Best Picture.  More recently, we've had
SHORT CUTS and SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION captured the same angst in a
rapidly changing American society.
THE ICE STORM revolves around Ben Hood (Kevin Kline), who lives with his
wife Elena (Joan Allen) in New Canaan, Connecticut in 1973.  His son
Paul (Tobey Maguire) goes to school in New York and is trying to lose
his virginity.  His 14-year-old daughter Wendy (Christina Ricci) is also
out to lose her girlhood by flirting with both Mikey Carver (Elijah
Wood), who lives nearby, and Mikey's younger brother Sandy (Adam
Hann-Byrd).  Ben, meanwhile, is carrying on an affair with the boys'
mother, Janey (Sigourney Weaver).  The youngsters try to sort out their
sexual feelings, and their parents aren't doing much better with theirs. 
I should say that I've never cared for these movies.  I think our
society is still having problems reevaluating its morals, and these
movies are right to point them out.  It's just that these films tend to
wallow in suburbia's moral malaise and come up short on the bigger
picture.  The people in THE ICE STORM seek psychotherapy and swap wives
at their little parties, and none of it brings them fulfillment or
enlightenment.  In fact, nobody in this movie seems to enjoy themselves
for even a moment, which makes it an ungodly drag.  You ask yourself why
these people don't convert to Judaism or take up skydiving or join a
theater group or read Oscar Wilde.  Maybe it's shallow of me to suggest
that these things might solve their problems, but these characters are
shallow - they don't have anything to do except be unhappy.  The suburbs
can be pretty dull, but intelligent, complex people manage to live there
without being entirely miserable.
Like ORDINARY PEOPLE, THE ICE STORM comes with a literary pedigree,
being based on Rick Moody's novel.  James Schamus's screenplay
adaptation suffers from arch, overly "literary" dialogue.  Mikey
explains that he's good at geometry but not at math by saying, "I get
the concept that two times two equals four.  Because it's a square.  Not
numbers, but space.  It's perfect.  Except that no one can draw a
perfect square."  I haven't read the book, but I suspect that
philosophizing like this plays much better on the page than it does in a
movie (not that it reads particularly well).  The dialogue hamstrings
all the actors, though Kevin Kline manages a few distinctive line
readings the way he usually does.  I'm also gratified at the casting of
Christina Ricci, an actress whose, oh, I don't know, voluptuousness
makes the character that much more real.  Any Hollywood studio would
have insisted on a supermodel-thin teenager, but the film acknowledges
the libido of a girl who still has her baby fat, and doesn't mock it. 
The cast as a whole, though, seems as pale as Frederick Elmes's
cinematography.  Here's where director Ang Lee's good taste finally gets
the better of him, as the wit and humor of his Taiwanese films and SENSE
AND SENSIBILITY disappear almost completely here.  There's a creepily
funny scene where Wendy makes out with Mikey while wearing a Richard
Nixon mask, but nobody here gets any pleasure out of cracking a joke.
Maybe I'm too harsh.  Maybe, like so many disciples of the great Pauline
Kael, I'm too severe to judge an austere piece like THE ICE STORM and
too quick to latch onto something like BOOGIE NIGHTS, which maybe isn't
any deeper as a critique of changing society but has moviemaking zest,
vitality, jouissance, flava, what have you on its side.  It just seems
to me that these movies about modern-day repression tend to kill off
their own dramatic possibilities - the characters may want to change,
but they can't, and usually they don't have any idea how to go about
it.  It pushes a movie towards stasis.  THE ICE STORM is a movie that's
trapped under the ice, and it'll leave you feeling the same way.

Author
Michael Redman
There's something resplendent about a winter ice storm that few people ever
experience as they huddle inside awaiting the thaw. Viewing from safety
through the glazed glass gives a distorted view of the beauty and the danger
outside in the extremes.
During the early seventies the suburbs were a questionable refuge from the
whirlwind of change sweeping through the country. As the trappings of the
cultural and sexual revolution became mainstream and seeped into those
shelters, it happened without much of its soul. The exploration of the sixties
turned into the "Me Decade" in a few short years.
In 1973 Ben Hood (Kevin Kline) is doing everything right. Married to a
beautiful woman, he has a successful career, two kids and a modern house in
the hamlet of New Canaan, Connecticut. It should be enough, but his life feels
empty. His loveless affair with neighbor Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver) isn't
helping much. When he wants to talk, she responds "You're boring me. I have a
husband. I don't have a need for another one."
Ben and Janey are indeed bored, not just with their spouses and each other,
but with everything they do. Like the rest of their friends, they are grasping
at straws searching for something to make them feel alive. They want to live
on the edge from the comfort of their living rooms.
In direct contrast, the children are embracing life, fumbling though they may
be. Paul Hood (Tobey Maguire) is away at boarding school and coming to grips
with his own sexuality attempting to get the attention of an attractive girl
before his Don Juan roommate gets to her first.
His younger sister Wendy tests her own sexual power with Janey's sons Duckie
(Adam Hann-Byrd) and Mikey (Elijah Wood). There's a great scene where she's
wearing a grotesque Nixon mask while Mikey lies on top of her in a basement
family room. "Take down your pants and I'll touch it, but that's all," she
tempts him. When Ben walks in on them after being abandoned in Janey's bed
upstairs, it's a snapshot of seventies suburban life.
Painfully shy Duckie spends most of his time attaching M-80s to model planes
and blowing them up in flight. His response to Wendy's propositions is fright.
He's outgrown his toys but can't quite figure out what to do about it.
All of this sexual tension comes to a head the day after Thanksgiving. The
adults of the neighborhood attend a "key party" where the men put their car
keys in a bowl and the women pick out a set to determine their partner for the
night. While the joyless wife-swapping party takes place, an ice storm rages outside.
The kids head out to partake of the tempest while their parents nervously
banter with each other. It's hazardous out there, but that's where life is.
It's only by venturing into the unknown that anything meaningful happens as
they will all discover. The only way to navigate the alien are with your eyes
wide open -- something no one in the film does. The children are too
inexperienced and the adults, too filled with ennui.
Surprisingly director Ang Lee ("Sense And Sensibility") does a good job
representing the era since he didn't move to the US from Taiwan until 1978. As
with many period pieces, there's a bit too many in-your-face artifacts. During
the first half you'll grow tired of waterbeds, ugly hairstyles and those
atrocious fashions, but they aren't shoved down your throat in the same manner
that they were in "Boogie Nights".
Stepping out of the theater on a crisp winter's night with ice crunching
beneath your feet, you'll realize that we are all slipping around out there in
the wilderness in one way or another. About the most we can hope for is that
we make it through with some measure of grace.
(Michael Redman has celebrated over 22 winter holiday seasons while writing
these columns. He's still awaiting the Christmas spirit.)
[This appeared in the 12/18/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Edwin Jahiel
THE ICE STORM *** 1/4  Directed by Ang Lee. Written by James Schamus from
the novel by Rick Moody. Photography, Frederick Elmes. Editing, Tom
Squyres. Production design, Mark Friedberg.  Costumes, Carol Olditz. Music,
Mychael Danna. Cast: Kevin Kline (Ben Hood), Joan Allen (Elena Hood),
Sigourney Weaver (Janey Carver), Jamey Sheridan (Jim Carver), Christina
Ricci (Wendy Hood), Toney Maguire (Paul Hood), Elijah Wood (Mikey Carver),
Adam Hann-Byrd (Sandy Carver), et al. A Fox Searchlight release. 113
minutes. Rated R  (sexual content). At the Art Theater.
Ang Lee, (b. 1954) studied theater in his native Taiwan, came to the U.S.
in 1978 where he continued his theater studies at the University of
Illinois (Urbana), before going on to the Film Department at New York
University. During a recent Lee retrospective and visit at the University
of Illinois, some of his former teachers remembered both Lee's eagerness
and his then-opaque English. In one play production which Lee was anxious
to be in, the linguistic problem was solved by the Solomonic decision to
cast him as a spear carrier, a non-speaking role.
Five years after his arrival to the U.S. Lee was already directing
pictures. At first shorter ones: "Dim Lake" (Best Taiwanese Film Award),
"Fine Line" (NYU Festival, Best film and director).Then came three features
that Lee also scripted: "Pushing Hands" (Best film, Asian Film Festival);
"The Wedding Banquet" (US-Taiwan) (Golden Bear in Berlin, many other
awards); and the Oscar-nominated "Eat Drink Man Woman,"(Taiwan).
In a radical shift, Lee filmed with huge success the very British novel by
Jane Austen "Sense and Sensibility" which had seven Oscar nominations and a
win for the scenario by its star Emma Thompson. This confounded the notion
of directors being unable (or at least uncomfortable) with subjects on
"alien" cultures. But then people forget that hordes of very American
movies were made in Hollywood by Europeans who spoke with thick foreign
accents. Think (among many) of Ernst Lubitsch. Or of Billy Wilder whose
scripts are full of U.S. vernacular, including the linguistically-oriented
comedy "Ball of Fire."
There should be no surprise that Lee adds to his repertory as entirely
American-with-a-vengeance feature as "The Ice Storm." Or that the film
continues Lee's brilliant career.
"The Ice Storm" is set just before, during and after Thanksgiving (an
ironic choice) in 1973 (a year of transitions) in New Canaan, Connecticut,
among the affluent WASP bourgeoisie. It concentrates on two families of
friends and neighbors. Ben and Elena Hood, their children Wendy, 14 and
Paul, 16; Janey and Jim Carver, their boys Mikey and Sandy.
The early 1970s are the inheritors and often the extension of the 1960s
upheavals, sexual and political revolutions, hippie-ism, pot and drugs. But
the film's characters are not all alike in conforming to non-conformism.
The kids are of that in-between adolescent  age that in all decades has
known rebellion, confusion and sexual exploration. The most notable is
Wendy who tries to experiment  with both Carver brothers. She also has a
political conscience, which seems to lack in others. 1973 is a year of
national problems and of political corruption underlined by a defensive
Richard Nixon who is much in evidence on TV as he alternates with weather
reports.
If the young ones acts like adolescents, so do the children's parents and
other grown-ups. They are the embodiment of the 60's slogan "Never trust
people over 30," having settled for a materially "good life," have no
interest in ideals, politics or causes. But they have retained the sexual
sea-changes of the earlier years. Ben is having a "just sex" affair with
Janey, whose husband is often on business trips. Other "adults," must have
also opted for coveting their neighbor's wives (or husbands). While this is
not shown at first, it becomes explicit when, after Thanksgiving Day, a
dozen or more couples attend a "key party." For the uninitiated, that's
when the male guests throw their car keys in a bowl. At evening's end,
after some people leave, each woman fishes out a key and goes home with it
owner.  (Sign of the times: a hip, long-haired new clergyman leaves the
party early but with strong hints that he has his eye on Elena).
The night of the party is also that of the worst ice storm in memory.
Things happen, including a tragedy that sobers up many in several ways. The
storm is beautifully photographed (with artificial ice), and exceptionally
good too is the period reconstruction of sights and sounds, artifacts,
clothing, paraphernalia.
The film's tone is one of ice-cold observation of people and mores, with
several touches of humor and irony that illustrate how dysfunctional both
generations are. Without heavy underlining
how the uneasy relationships of adults and their essential egotism affect
the children, there is a lack of rapport that is pin-pointed by details and
by indirect symbolism. Ben has what he thinks is a heart-to-heart talk with
his son but is in reality ludicrous. Wendy coolly shoplifts candy in a
drugstore, and separately, her rich but disoriented  mother lifts lipsticks
there. In play, young Sandy, without understanding the causes, blows up toy
airplanes and whips a flowering bush.
The problem with the young people is the older people , at least in part.
The problem with the older people is that they are hollow men. The adults
may be salacious, but are unfeeling.  In "Something of Value," the Robert
Ruark novel set in troubled Kenya and in the 1957 film, the epigraph says,
more or less, "If a  people lose their gods, they must replace them with
something of value."
In Ang Lee's previous films about Taiwanese, old values and new values
coexisted or else some new ones replaced older ones. But among the "The Ice
Storm"'s characters there are no visible values of any sort. The people are
hollow men, dead souls, running on empty. Yet the movie does not look at
them in a reprimanding way but rather with a cool kind of pity. This makes
for an absence (I am not saying "a lack"--there's a difference) of the
dramatic tension that we have been conditioned to take for granted. It's no
defect. Nor is the fact that the adults are shown as unidimensional
stereotypes, since that's what they really are. And what they are is seen
with a sharp eye for descriptions within a rapid succession of episodes.
Many episodes.
The actual ice storm is a fine metaphor for the essential coldness of the
grownups and their actions, transparent and brittle like ice, ice that
breaks relationships as it breaks trees.  The tragedy that concludes the
movie is a bit too neat as divine punishment or nature's retribution, but
at least the film has the good sense not to wrap up with simple sadness
rather than fake, sentimental cliches of people forever changed for the
better.
I have seen "The Ice Storm" twice, at Cannes and here, just the other day.
Abroad, I worried about the viewers thinking that Yanks have it all over
the French in the casual sex department. In real life the Gallic attitude
is far more tolerant than in the States. The reaction to carnal sins by
politicians and celebrities elicits shrugging shoulders and no headlines.
As for French cinema, physical relations go more often than not with grand
passions. In the U.S. I worried lest the movie be taken as a wholesale
indictment of the 70s rather than what it is, a view of a given segment of
the population.
Both times I suspected that "Ice" is overloaded with sign-post scenes to
reinforce its themes of dysfunctionality, with too much cross-cutting
between the young and the older.  Another small  quibble is that for those
who stay (that is, almost no one) for the end credits, the overall very
good music concludes with a mood-cutting vocal.
In a film with unusually sparse dialogue, the acting bears a heavy burden.
It is superior, especially Kevin Kline's, Wendy Hood's, the other
youngsters' and Sigourney Weaver's. Ms Weaver, with less screen-time than I
wished for, looks gorgeous as an icy spider-lady and has the  movie's best
line. In bed with her, Kline post-coitally rambles on about being forced
for business reasons to play hated golf, and about a rival colleague taking
lessons. Sigourney turns to him coldly : " Ben, you are boring me. I have a
husband. I don't particularly feel the need for another."

Author
Dennis Schwartz

ICE STORM, THE (director: Ang Lee; screenwriter: James Shamus;
cinematographer: Frederick Elmes; cast: Kevin Kline (Ben Hood),
Sigourney Weaver (Jane Carver), Joan Allen (Elena Hood), Jamey Sheridan
(Jim Carver), Christina Ricci (Wendy
Hood), Elijah Wood (Mikey Carver), Adam Hann-Byrd (Sandy Carver),Tobey
Maguire (Paul Hood), 1997)
The story takes place in the wealthy WASPish 'burb of New Canaan,
Connecticut, on Thanksgiving week, 1973, when there is an ice storm and
a catastrophe is to follow that shakes up this bourgeois town. It is
through the eyes of two families who are friends and neighbors that we
follow the events leading up to the tragedy. Ben (Kline) and Elena Hood
(Joan), their children, the sexually curious Wendy (Ricci), 14 and the
preppie Paul (Tobey), 16; the other family consists of Jane (Sigourney)
and Jim Carver (Jamey), their boys, the brilliant high school student
Mikey (Elijah) and the younger son, the troubled and introverted Sandy
(Adam).
This is played out against the negativity of the current Nixon
administration, with some of the teens reflecting their parents'
conservative political views and others vehemently on opposite sides of
their parents.This is also a film about the parents' dissatisfaction
with their empty lives, as they grumble about what they perceive to be
missing in their lives. This dissatisfaction makes it possible for an
affair between Ben and Jane to take place. But even that affair is stale
(after he can't stop talking in bed and she chillingly tells him to keep
quiet, "You are boring me, I have a husband and I don't need another
one").
The lives of the children are scrutinized in the same way their parents'
lives are, and the results are almost identical. The children, despite
their discontentments with the outside world, are almost mirror images
of their empty parents, unwilling to be honest with themselves, or too
honest with themselves for their own good. Meanwhile, the revolutionary
spirit of the times seems to be passing them by. Tobey struggles to
relate with girls, as he is awkward, unsure of what to do or say. He is
at the phase of his life where he is experimenting with drugs in the
stupidest of ways; Wendy is unwisely looking to explore sex, but unaware
of the consequences of her decisions; Mickey is reckless and unsure of
how to handle his playful sense of adventure and freedom; Sandy is all
bottled-up inside, wanting to love and be loved, while at the same time
full of anger.
The introduction of nature into their lives brings about a stark
reality, in the form of the Thanksgiving ice storm. The ice storm is
magnificently opulent in its whitish, blueish, and gray colors (the ice
was artificially made, but it looks only too real). It symbolically
represents the truth that can't be denied, no matter what games the
adults (wife-swapping) and children (touching their private parts) play.
The beauty of the ice storm is even more menacing and attractive when it
is added to the more placid beauty of the town's countryside; but it is
also dangerous, as we see how the one surbanite truly influenced by the
beauty of the storm, also succumbs to it.
It is amazing that this film was made by a foreigner, who is able to get
into some of the nuances that pricked the skin of those living through
those times (It still surprises me, though Hollywood has a rich history
of foreigners doing just that, examples would be, messieurs Lang and
Sirk). Lee was born in Taiwan and did not live here until 1978, yet he
is able to capture a slice of what it was like here in the early '70s,
and what it was like to be a rich American in the middle of great social
change.
The characters are intricately drawn together, but each is complex and
not reduced to being a caricature. Kline's performance is central to the
film, he reflects on who he thinks he is supposed to be while his
marriage has gone cold.While Ricci's performance is simply breathtaking
in its verve, as she appears to be the only one of the teen group who
really feels what is going on politically and socially.
These are successful people, and there is a reason why they are
successful, and for all the holes in their life, we see how they are
able to go after what they want and get it, the only thing that seems to
be alluding them and out of their reach, is gaining peace of mind.
This film is to be admired for its vividly icy observations of suburban
life, letting us clearly see the intensity and restlessness that lies
behind the carefully manicured personas of the rich. Its use of the ice
storm's raw power, in all its beauty and danger, as a metaphor on the
dysfunctionality of the characters, were both well-utilized and, at the
same time, utilized too much. The ice storm came to symbolize what can
so easily be taken away from any one, in one rapid moment, if one is not
prudent or careful in their life. The film can be slightly faulted for
putting too much weight on the ice storm and its symbolical message, and
for trying to make too much of the comparison between the children and
the parents, thereby not doing enough justice to either, as the
characterizations tended to appear to be too forced into fitting in with
the metaphor of the ice storm.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott
For more reviews, go to nuvo-online.com and click on "film."
Ice storms are magnificent and dangerous. The outdoor world becomes a 
gallery of ominous wonders, filled with crystalline sculptures that 
glisten in the winter light. Of course, the ice creates great hazards 
along with the beauty. Tree limbs and power lines grow heavy and snap 
under the extra weight, while surface areas become slick and treacherous. 
Although ice storms are alluring, most people choose to stay inside. 
Those who elect to venture out do so with great caution. 
But not the characters in "The Ice Storm." Adults hop in their cars to go 
for a drive on the slippery roads, while children venture forth to 
explore. One boy actually maneuvers his way onto a frozen diving board, 
where he proceeds to bounce up and down over the concrete surface of an 
empty swimming pool. Why? Why does a group of apparently intelligent 
people repeatedly engage in self-destructive behavior? 
"The Ice Storm" succeeds because director Ang Lee doesn't tell us why. 
Set in an affluent suburb of New Canaan, Connecticut in 1973, against the 
backdrop of Watergate and the remnants of the 60s cultural revolution, 
the angst-filled characters play out their lives without explanation. To 
paraphrase Lisa Simpson, they are enigmas, wrapped in riddles, wearing 
polyester. 
Lee, director of "Sense and Sensibility" and the wonderful "Eat Drink Man 
Woman," uses the tacky fashions of the early 70s to establish the era, 
but generally avoids playing the garish trappings for comedy. His stance 
is that of an observer, maintaining almost as much emotional distance as 
his characters keep between each another. He uses a beautifully staged 
ice storm as a metaphor, but leaves it to the viewer to determine exactly 
what aspect of human behavior the metaphor is addressing. The result is 
disquieting and compelling; images of these foolish people linger long 
after the movie is over.
The story, based on Rick Moody's 1994 novel, focuses on the Carvers and 
the Hoods, upscale New Canaan families who frequently travel the wooded 
path between their houses. Benjamin Hood (Kevin Kline) is the bed-mate of 
Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver) in a loveless affair. Meanwhile, his wife 
Elena (Joan Allen) trudges through her duties, brimming with hostility 
but playing the role of silent martyr. Jim, Janey's husband, is a 
preoccupied type who makes little impact on his family. When he returns 
from one of his frequent business trips and cheerfully tells his boys 
"I'm back," one of them replies "You were gone?"
As the tension builds between the adults, their children keep busy aping 
their parent's behavior. When not glued to her television watching the 
Watergate proceedings or tossing caustic remarks at her father, Wendy 
Hood (Christina Ricci) pursues her sexual curiosity with both of the 
Carver boys; moody, analytical Mike (Elijah Wood) and his little brother 
Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd,) a painfully shy kid who spends his spare moments 
blowing up his toys. Wendy's brother Paul (Tobey Maguire) comes home from 
prep school for Thanksgiving, but his focus is back at school, where he 
vies with his roommate for the attention of a beautiful young woman. 
With the Carvers and the Hoods, it all keeps coming back to sex. The New 
Canaan suburbanites have read about the Sexual Revolution and are 
determined to keep up with fashion. Everything builds to a pivotal scene 
involving a Key Party, where the men drop their car keys in a bowl. At 
the end of the evening, the wives are to fish keys from the bowl and go 
home with whoever owns them. The camera captures all of the awkwardness 
of the hapless partygoers, downing large amounts of liquor and bantering 
nervously as they strain to be on the cutting edge of sexual behavior.
Lee is adept at creating a vivid sense of place, using numerous 
establishing and tracking shots to make the wistful, forlorn atmosphere 
of New Canaan come alive. When Elena looks up from a sidewalk book sale 
and sees her daughter riding her bike down the street, you can almost 
feel the crispness of the autumn air. Watching her daughter, Elena envies 
Wendy's freedom and playfulness, unaware that the young girl isn't 
feeling anything of the kind.
That sort of emotional misunderstanding is common in "The Ice Storm." The 
uniformly strong cast conveys the discomfort the characters feel with 
themselves and each other. Trapped in some perceived code of behavior, 
these people desperately want to relate to each other openly and honestly,
 but don't have a clue how to do it, so they make impulsive, foolish 
gestures. They know the danger inherent in an ice storm, but can't resist 
the beauty, so they venture out onto the slick surfaces anyway. And they 
fall.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
THE ICE STORM
 By Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Fox Searchlight Pictures
 Director:  Ang Lee
 Writer:  James Schamus
 Cast: Sigourney Weaver, Kevin Kline, Joan Allen, Elijah
Wood, Christina Ricci, Tobey Maguire, Adam Hann-Byrd.
   "A rotten fish stinks from the head down."  "Like father, like
son."  "When it rains, it pours."  These are just some of the
proverbs illustrated by Ang Lee in the film which opened the
1997 New York Film Festival, "The Ice Storm."  The
Taiwanese director, who moved to the United States in 1978
and proceeded to dissect social mores of 19th Century
England in "Sense and Sensibility," and explore the
estrangement of a Taipei master chef from his three
daughters in "Eat Drink Man Woman," has again done a
superb job of commenting on family values. This time the
action has shifted to the upper-middle-class America of the
early 1970s, as Lee probes the pathologies which seem to
have seeped down from the Nixon presidency to infect the
lives of Connecticut families of the chief executive's social
class.  Whether Lee is suggesting some parallel between the
corruption of the administration and domestic debauchery, or
is making a statement about the sinfulness stimulated by
suburbia, or perhaps even observing the silliness of the
seventies, is not consequential.  What is notable is that he
spreads out before us a lush banquet of neatly observed
perverse fare in James Schamus's deft adaptation of a recent,
well-received novel by Rick Moody. 
   Why choose 1973 as the time of the action?  This period in
America embodies the culmination of a dramatic experiment
in lifestyles which began perhaps in 1968 with the disruption
of the Democratic National Convention and was characterized
by experimentation with sexual freedom, a display of garish
wearing apparel which includes orange, polyester garments,
the widespread use of mind-altering drugs such as LSD and
cocaine, and an implicit encouragement of people to do their
own thing even if their actions conflicted with responsibilities
to their children.
   Lee focuses on two families, the Hoods and the Carvers. 
Ben Hood (Kevin Kline) and his quietly suffering wife Elena
(Joan Allen) have one 16-year-old son, Paul (Tobey Maguire)
in prep school and daughter Wendy (Christina Ricci) who is
beginning to test her sexual allure on both Carver children. 
Jim Carver (Jamey Sheridan), who is frequently out of town
on business leaves his wife Janey (Sigourney Weaver) free to
dabble in a joyless affair with Ben, and his two boys Mikey
(Elijah Wood) and Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd) unfettered by
normal parental guidance.  The film spends a good deal of its
113 minutes surveying the activities of the children, which
appear to parallel the sordid ventures of the adults.  In one
unusual scene Wendy dons a Nixon mask and begins some
heavy petting with Mikey, only to be caught by Wendy's dad,
Ben, who happened to be conducting his assignation with
Janey in the upstairs room.  Ben's wife Elena, who suspects
the goings-on of her husband but represses her anger, takes
out her rebellion by shoplifting lipstick from the local
pharmacy.  Her daughter Wendy does likewise.  
   The climactic scene takes place at a wife-swapping party
attended by the well-to-do suburbanites in the area, a
gathering which follows a California custom known as the key
party.  Male celebrants toss their car keys into a bowl and
begin to drink, smoke, and mingle.  Hours later, each woman
dips into the vessel and goes home with the owner of the
keys she has selected.  During the merrymaking an ice storm
has moved into the town of New Canaan, Connecticut, a
blizzard which acts as metaphor to the coldness of family life
among the Hoods, the Carvers, and others of their social
class.  The entire story is narrated by Paul, the Hoods'
sixteen-year-old son.  He has come home for the
Thanksgiving weekend in the desperate hope that he and his
family could spend a joyful and loving weekend together
under the roof of their lavish home and give thanks for the
material and spiritual splendors which life in America affords
for so many. Instead he is confronted by the dissipation of
those who would guide him: a father who hides an inability to
communicate with him with a flurry of fatuous phrases, a
mother too depressed to instill gladness in his heart, and a
sister who reaches out for love by provoking sexual
encounters with a boy in his early teens and the child's
brother.
   Kevin Kline comes across once again as one of America's
great actors, able to coax hilarity from movies like "In and
Out" and "Fierce Creatures" and well-executed pathos from
his current work.  He is supported by a crackerjack group of
young stars like Elijah Wood, Adam Hann-Byrd, Tobey
Maguire and especially Christina Ricci and by a the two
women in his life, Sigourney Weaver as a dragon lady who
combines withering remarks with her sexual calisthenics and
Joan Allen in her signature role of eternally anguished wife.
   "The Ice Storm" proves that a movie can most effectively
and entertainingly study the disintegration of a society without
soap-opera melodramatics or blazingly photographed uproars. 
"The Ice Storm" combines comedy and tragedy productively,
a solid, intelligent, adult drama of people who should have
everything going for them but forsake their good fortune in an
array of excesses.  Rated PG-13.  Running Time: 113
minutes.  (C) 1997 Harvey Karten

Author
Nick Ferguson
This short review was written for Edinburgh University's 'Student'
newspaper.
Kevin Kline, Joan Allen, Sigourney Weaver
When Taiwanese director Ang Lee proposed he would direct Sense and
Sensibility, snooty British critics scoffed at the notion that Johnny
Foreigner could grasp the issues at the core of Jane Austen's very English
novel. Thankfully, Lee proves his doubters wrong again with this adaptation
of an American book - set over Thanksgiving break in 1973, The Ice Storm
details the lives of two neighbouring families and how the unfolding events
of a few days affect them.
Those of you hoping Sigourney Weaver appears brandishing a phased plasma
pulse rifle will be disappointed to learn that the film centres around the
gloomy lives of the central adult characters. The emptiness of their
relationships with each other is echoed in vacant exchanges with their
children. The adulterous affair between Weaver and Kevin Kline is paralleled
by Weaver's son (Elijah Wood) and his awkward fumblings with Kline's
daughter (a disturbingly chunky Christine Ricci). The other members of the
families have their own problems - Kline's older son is competing with his
best friend over his latest crush, while neurotic wife Joan Allen is
beginning to suspect her husband's affair.
All this makes The Ice Storm sound like one of those god awful coming-of-age
movies, but it isn't about that - it's about the importance of family. The
style and setting make the film remarkably fresh, doing without the chipper
Hollywood "Leave it to Beaver" narration and instead book-ending the film
using an analogy with the Fantastic Four is just one example of the film's
innovative handling of a typically crusty genre. It also features some of
the most painfully accurate scenes of blooming sexuality committed to film -
it's refreshing, if cringe worthy, to see realistic depictions of grubby
adolescents in a movie. The 70's theme might sound superfluous, but as in
the splendid Boogie Nights the attitudes and events of the time resonate
powerfully with the lives of the characters in the film.
As The Ice Storm begins to tie itself together for a satisfying finale it
might seem predictable, but the crisp direction and low-key performances
mean the film is anything but schmaltzy. The sour-sweet ending is both a
celebration and a tragedy; those of you prone to leaving the theatre with a
misty expression will undoubtedly end up on the phone to your folks that
evening, burbling on about how much they mean to you. You saps.
Nick Fergusonnickf@writeme.com
http://www.saqnet.co.uk/users/nickf/index.html
http://www.n64gazetta.com
"Our responsibility here is finished..."

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
"When it's cold, molecules aren't moving. Everything is clean."
These are the essential words of Mikey Carver (Elijah Wood), a young teenage
boy living in 1973 New Canaan, Connecticut in THE ICE STORM. When Mikey
delivers these words to a bored science class, it is unlikely that anyone
realizes how much they parallel Mikey's life and the lives that surround him.
His father Jim (Jamey Sheridan) is rarely seen and his mother Janey (Sigourney
Weaver) is having an affair with married neighbor Ben Hood (Kevin Kline).
Ben's wife Elena (Joan Allen) suspects the affair, but doesn't say anything.
Meanwhile, Ben's 14-year-old daughter Wendy (Christina Ricci) continuously
lures Mikey and his younger brother Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd) into sexual
explorations.
Tobey Maguire plays Paul Hood, the 16-year-old narrator of the story who also
happens to be the least prevalent character. We start the film with an
interesting outlook on family from Paul. He compares family to the Fantastic
Four comic book, and even goes so far as to say that family is everybody's own
anti-matter; something everybody will return to eventually, and the farther
you go, the deeper you'll return.
THE ICE STORM is a character piece that explores a dismal time both in
America, and in the individual lives portrayed in the movie. Everything
parallels everything else. The young teenagers trying to discover who they are
thru drugs, sex, and alcohol is really almost identical to the parents trying
to figure out the purpose in their own lives using the same methods.
"When it's cold outside, the molecules aren't moving. Everything is clean."
Everything is clean because nobody will admit what's going on. Even the
president is on TV denying his wrong-doings. How can you expect anything more
out of a couple of suburban families riding the coattails of sexual
revolution? All the sex and drugs is so obviously empty, and I think that's
the point of the film. At first viewing, the entire movie might seem empty,
but then why shouldn't it parallel itself? You don't get to know the
characters very deeply, but I think that's because nobody in the movie knows
each other either. We sadly watch two families go about their lives nearly
oblivious to one another. At first glance, you might think emotion is lost in
the ending scenes because you haven't gotten to know the characters well
enough to sympathize - then you realize that just might be the point, and then
you do feel the pain.
The acting by all is quite good, but I particularly liked Elijah Wood. He
doesn't seem to be receiving as much recognition as the others, but I still
found him to possess quite a real sense of being. Christina Ricci is being
acclaimed for her part as the misguided teenage temptress who looks for
something more to her life in the pants of every available boy. Still, I say
hats off remain to Wood, Joan Allen's subtle but believable performance as a
lonely, unappreciated wife, and the always excellent Kevin Kline. Tobey
Maguire did a fine job, but his character which, perhaps, was the most intact,
sensible person in the story, seemed a little lost. He was needed, but perhaps
he should've been used more.
THE ICE STORM is being hailed by many as one of the best films of the year. I
hate to say that I don't agree, but I don't. In fact, I can think of many
other films that I would rank higher than this one. Even so, it is a very good
film. It takes a lot of retrospect to fully appreciate it's art, but when you
finally start seeing things in it that you didn't before, you start to grow
even fonder of the characters and the story. Perhaps this is one to see,
ponder, and then watch again with different eyes.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        Christina Ricci saying, "I'll show you mine if you show me 
yours," _that's_ what more arthouse movies need. THE ICE STORM, 
adapted from the novel by Rick Moody, is a powerful Ang Lee film 
that explores the world of empty bitterness and loneliness of two 
Connecticut families during the sexual revolution of the '70s. As we 
all know, the American colonial war wasn't the only revolution with 
a "shot heard 'round the world." I don't know what that last sentence 
was supposed to mean exactly; just chalk it up to one more vague 
sexual innuendo from the mouth of Andrew.
        Kevin Kline, Mr. Name Above the Title, plays an average 
husband. He's got a wife (Joan Allen), two kids and a lot of tacky, 
big-collared shirts. It's the kind of family that ships the teenage son 
off to boarding school, leaves the teenage daughter at home and 
heads off to some lame party every night, parties where they 
speculate about those wild California "key" parties. That's when the 
men put their car keys in a bowl and the women fish out a random 
set of keys at the end of the night to see which guy they're going 
home with. It beats the hell out of mistletoe, I'll tell you that.
        Kline also happens to be having an affair with the 
neighbor, Sigourney "Zuul" Weaver. But look out, tables are 
turning, Allen eventually gets it on with the husband in his car ("Do 
these seats go back?") and Weaver's son (Elijah Wood) is messing 
around with Kline's daughter (Ricci), the kind of plot twist you'd 
find in an X-rated episode of "The Brady Bunch." At the same time, 
Ricci is drawn to Wood's younger brother, a weird kid who spends 
his time blowing up his model airplanes and hanging his Army 
dolls.
        Meanwhile, there's Kline's son, the only person who 
manages to pursue anyone outside the neighbor's family. Home from 
boarding school for Thanksgiving weekend, he arranges a train trip 
into New York to see a girl from his school. For once, he's trying to 
get to a woman before his best friend does, until he shows up at the 
house and finds the friend already there. This storyline was my 
personal favorite of the movie, as someone who's had that special 
"brother" relationship with a lot of girls I've had crushes on.
        THE ICE STORM takes its precious time to get started, but 
once it does, it turns into one hell of a ride. Its circular, orchestrated 
plot and existential dialogue keep it from being anything raunchy or 
low-brow. In a movie where people of all ages search for meaning in 
sex, drugs and alcohol, nothing is glorified or exaggerated. That is 
the beauty of THE ICE STORM and, having seen it, I can now say 
with all honesty, "I'll show you mine if you show me yours."
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for more than 1/25th of a century!

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Ang Lee
Writer: James Schamus (from the novel by Ron Moody)
Starring: Kevin Kline, Sigourney Weaver, Joan Allen, Jamie Sheridan,
Christina Ricci, Tobey Maguire, Elijah Wood, Adam Hann-Byrd, David
Krumholtz, Katie Holmes, Henry Czerny, Michael Cumpsty, Glenn Fitzgerald
Sometimes in life, the role models we grow up with are as confused as we
are.  Such is the case in Ang Lee's newest film since "Sense and
Sensibility:" "The Ice Storm."  All the people in this film are
immature, but that's just because even the parents have no one to rely
on for help, what being the time of Watergate and the sexual
revolution.  "The Ice Storm" brings us an atmospheric, moody, and
entertaining little morality play which never gets preachy or even
boring.
"The Ice Storm" choses its time and place to be around Thanksgiving in
1973, and in suburban Connecticut.  Here we meet two families: the Hoods
and the Carvers.  Ben Hood (Kevin Kline) is married to Elena (Joan
Allen), but is having an affair with Janie Carver (Sigourney Weaver),
though there is no passion except for that of sexual.  It seems that Ben
is ignoring his wife for Janie, who is ignoring and also being ignored
by her workaholic husband, George (Jamie Sheridan, who played the devil
in "The Stand" mini-series).
This all rubs off on the kids of each family, who are growing up being
raised by confused parents, and of course, with Nixon lying out his ass
on the television.  Wendy Hood (Christina Ricci) is not only very
anti-Nixon and very political in her thinking, but is very sexually
precocious, as she is experimenting with the confused and near-silent
Mikey Carver (none other than Elijah Wood, who made this after his
performance in "Flipper," I think).  Of course, Mikey's younger brother,
Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd, who was in Jodie Foster's "Little Man Tate"),
lusts after Wendy in the worst way (staring at her butt crack in band
practice, pitifully trying to talk to her, etc).
The other Hood kid is Paul (Tobey Maguire, who's in Woody Allen's next
flick, "Deconstructing Harry"), who is enrolled at a classy prep school
where he lusts after the intelligent Libbets (Katie Holmes).  Paul is
basically the protagonist, as everything is seen through his eyes, even
if he is reminiscing about something which he was detached from.  He's
also a symbol of parental uncaring, as his parents have shipped him off
to a far-away school, and never see him.  His relationship with everyone
but Wendy is damn near silent (he has an awkwardly hysterical scene with
Ben in the car-ride from the train-ride towards the middle).
The film views the parents with a negative light, as they are often
giant hypocrites, and totally immature.  Everyone seems to want to live
without any responsibilities, even Elena, who almost seems like a
martyr, but her character is much deeper than that.  She has a part
where she re-enacts what her daughter does - riding a bike, and
shoplifting.  But the shoplifting, of course, is hardly as sucessful as
it is when Wendy does it, thus the adults cannot be as wreckless as the
kids are.
But in the same vein, the kids cannot be as immature as the parents
are.  Wendy is constantly fooling around with the two Carver kids, and
sometimes with bad results.  Her "I'll show you mine if you show me
yours" game is caught by Janie (who gives a greatly hysterical and
satirical speech to her), while she is later caught fooling around with
Mikey by someone (in a great scene where she puts on a Nixon mask).
The film is highly satirical of both though.  The parents are in a
confusing time, therefore are not totally to blame.  The film is
intelligent enough to not pass all the blame onto them anyway, but
contribute it to the way the world was at the time.  Nixon is being
investigated for Watergate, the sexual revolution is going on...it's
just not a good time.  Everyone is confused, and we see the result of
all this with a tear-jerking tragedy at the end that almost had me
weeping, if I wasn't in a theater.
Like "Boogie Nights," "The Ice Storm" feels exactly like the time it has
chosen to take place in.  We get the full feel of the 70s, with all the
fashion, the waterbeds, the key parties, etc.  Ang Lee choses very
little actual 70s music (I heard some Jim Croce and Harry Nilsson), but
the film feels exactly like the 70s were.  So kudos to whomever did the
research.
The acting is also amazing, with several people standing out for
possible Oscar contenders.  Kevin Kline is predictably brilliant, giving
a wonderful dramatic performance with total human feeling.  The scene in
the car with his son is a prime example of him trying to be a good
parent but failing because he's human and doesn't actually know his son
anymore.  Joan Allen, who might be seeing her third consecutive Oscar
nomination, is also brilliant, creating a full person out of someone who
could just be a shallow character.  Sigourney Weaver also constructs a
multi-layered performance, especially at a scene where she tells Ben why
she ditched him one day when they were about to screw.  Jamie Sheridan
has a very little part, but he's still awesome, especially at the end,
and in a scene which consists of what has to be the shortest sex scene
in cinematic history...well, since that one in "Booty Call."
The kid actors are also amazing.  Tobey Maguire has a very small part,
but still rocks.  Adam Hann-Byrd is just amazing as the younger brother,
and Elijah Wood even gives a great performance.  Hopefully his career
will perk back up after this one (I'm talking about Elijah).  
The best performance, though, goes to Christina Ricci, who finally gets
a chance to shine in a role which is complex, and more human.  Sure,
she's always great (her Wednesday Addams is classic), but here she
actually gets to do human drama.  She has a kind of Lolita-esque draw to
her, and she just gives a mesmerizing performance among everybody else. 
Of course, no one actor steals the show, which makes this one of the
best ensemble films of the year.
Ang Lee has created a pure masterpiece here, and what may be the best
film I've seen all year (along with "Boogie Nights").  If he doesn't get
nominated for an Oscar this year, there's really something wrong,
because "The Ice Storm" is a wonderful film, handled with the utmost
delicacy to every human detail.  Like "Boogie Nights," I was blown away
by this film, but in far more different and emotional way.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Cavan van Ulft
Ice Storm, The (1997)
http://us.imdb.com/Title?Ice+Storm,+The+(1997)
Rating: 9 out of 10 (alternate scale: ****1/2)
_The Ice Storm_ is perhaps the first movie ever to have taken a long,
probing look at the Sexual Revolution of the 1970s, and then decided to
unwaveringly condemn it for what it was: an infantile exercise in sexual
adventure that ultimately destroyed families. It might strike some as
ironic (or distasteful) that it took a foreign director, the masterful
Ang Lee, to expose America's Nixon-era social shortcomings, but he does
it with the evenhanded objectivity that only a spectator of the game
could hope to enjoy, creating in the process a truly remarkable piece of
filmmaking.
In the opening scene, as the sun comes up over an ice-beaten
Connecticut railway line, we are led to believe that this will be a
story about the blows that family members deal one another without even
knowing, or meaning it. Instead, the focus here is on pain: profound,
all-encompassing pain. In this bleak Connecticut autumn, everyone is a
victim, and the victimisation is as deliberate and inescapable as it is
pervasive. There are no pointed fingers, no convenient scapegoats. There
is no one without sin here, and no one whose sins go unpunished. Far
from engaging in the naive outrage of the day at a corrupt system
spinning out of control, the film takes a detached historical
perspective of events, resigned to a tacit approval of those horrors of
modern society which constitute its characters' greatest fears. This
film reminds all of us that we have stopped wincing at our
convictionless environment. It has become normal.
The inept, halfhearted extramarital misadventures of the affluent
Silent Generation parents of New Canaan, Connecticut eerily mirror the
hesitant sexual explorations of their children. These wizened,
politically conscious children look on in disbelief as their ignorant
and self-absorbed parents spiral into oblivion. The traditional familial
roles of parent and child have been reversed; not in order to conform to
some clever poetic device, but because that is what actually went on in
the American households of the early seventies. The inference is clear:
something is rotten in the state Connecticut.
The entire cast functions perfectly together, a large and
incomprehensibly complex machine that brings to fruition the film's
desolate theme. Kevin Kline drives his character, the disconsolate
adulterer Benjamin Hood, with boundless, naked talent. He stares,
dead-eyed, out the window of his concrete tower high above New York; he
carries his daughter in his arms through the forest, determined,
intense; drunk, at a party, he sits, sullen and withdrawn, but never,
ever idle. Benjamin Hood is a selfish man, but he takes no pleasure from
life; indeed, nor do any of the characters: they all smile, at one point
or another, but these are but temporary glimpses of what a happy life
could be like, and in the face of all that is going wrong, these moments
do not last long. The chill, wet air, `the molecules,' as Mikey Carver
(played with touching innocence by Elijah Wood) says, seem to cast a
palpable pall over everyone and everything in New Canaan. Joan Allen's
finely-wrought, intelligent portrayal of Benjamin's wife, Elena, fuming
impotently at the wrongs done her, provides the perfect compliment to
Kline's character. Christina Ricci turns in what is certainly the most
flawless and fully-realised performance of her young career, as the
Hoods' inquisitive and opinionated daughter, Wendy. This girl is a
complete, believable person whose anguish spills out onto the screen in
great torrents.
_The Ice Storm_ is a film that had to be made. It provides no easy
answers to its characters' problems; it solves nothing. But perhaps it
stands as a warning against allowing the social and psychological
mismanagement of an entire generation of North American children to ever
again occur.

Author
Christopher Null
     Kitschy seventies comedy does battle with some painful dramatics in Ang
Lee's highly-regarded THE ICE STORM, but the question of which of these wins
is still in the air.
     It's 1973, and the sexual revolution is in full bloom.  So are the thick
shag carpets, glass-bead necklaces, Watergate hearings, and teen angst.  And
its an Arctic Thanksgiving weekend in Connecticut where these things all come
together, at the home of a small and highly dysfunctional family.
     Kline and Allen are the hapless parents of Maguire and Ricci, and
everyone's up to no good in the sex department.  Dad is having an affair with
the next door neighbor (Weaver), and the kids are ripe for all manner of
trouble with show-and-tell games, experimental drugs, et. al.  Oh, and Mom is
pretty pissed about all of this.
     Taken the wrong way, all of this can be pretty hilarious, and for the
first hour, it is, as reminiscing over the maroon tux I wore to my cousin's
wedding wins out over the drama behind the non-stop 70's jokes.  But after
that, the film takes a somber, almost melodramatic tone, and it ceases poking
fun and starts asking questions -- questions which, ultimately, are never
answered to any degree of satisfaction.
     The tragic ending is expected and simply doesn't leave you at peace. 
While I'm not the type of moviegoer who needs everything neatly spelled out, I
do appreciate some sense of closure.  In the end, this film is an enjoyable
one, but it may be a little too hip for its own good.
D: Ang Lee
P: Ted Hope, Ang Lee, James Schamus
W: James Schamus
S: Kevin Kline, Joan Allen, Courtney Peldon, Henry Czerny, Tobey Maguire,
Christina Ricci, Elijah Wood, Sigourney Weaver
http://www.foxsearchlight.com/ice/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Jerry Saravia
The 1970's remains the most fascinating decade of the last sixty years. It was
time of political corruption, assassinations, funky clothes, mop tops,
psychedelic music, blaxploitation cinema, subversive literature and films, etc.
Films of the 90's continue to explore this decade in great detail from "Casino"
to "Nixon" to "Dazed and Confused" to the current "Ice Storm," a delicate,
delectable, irregular tragicomedy of family manners and mores. 
The film's basic structure is patterned around Thanksgiving weekend in 1973 in
the quaint little town of New Canaan, Connecticut. Kevin Kline stars as Ben
Hood, a corporate executive and father to a semi-dysfunctional family where
nobody quite listens to anyone else. Ben is not entirely satisfied with his
life and indulges in a less-than-stimulating affair with his beautiful
neighbor, Jane (Sigourney Weaver). Ben's wife (the fantastic Joan Allen) is a
frigid, repressed woman who seems to find no joy in her life except when she's
stealing red lipstick from the local pharmacy or chatting with the local
minister. Their daughter (Christina Ricci) is affected by the Nixon campaign,
steals candy bars from stores, and is developing hormonal desires towards her
dazed boyfriend (Elijah Wood) and his tense brother (Adam Hann-Byrd).
 "The Ice Storm" is essentially an observation of family life after the end of
the Vietnam War and during the numerous liberation movements of that period.
The country is beset by lies such as the Watergate debacle, and in the
messiness of family life in typical suburbia. We see the traditional
Thanksgiving dinner; "key" parties where women pick up men to drive with by
randomly picking keys from a bowl; and the teenagers who indulge in marihuana,
sexual games, drinking, and playing with death, e.g., Elijah Wood walking on a
diving board during an ice storm. 
These are all events and they are depicted with knowing clarity by director
Ang Lee. Lee explores this territory better than any American film director
might have, yet he does not bring us close to the characters - we remain
distanced from them and their troubles. Lee was the ideal director for "Sense
and Sensibility" in showing repressed minds but this is set in the 70's, a time
of liberation not repression. The only fully developed character (and one whom
we are not distanced from) is Ben's daughter played by the remarkable Ricci who
brings a wry sense of humor to her precocious character - she has a
terrifically humorous moment where she dons a Nixon mask while trying to have
sex with her boyfriend. The other characters are merely thin characterizations
presented in mostly fleeting moments. Sigourney Weaver is especially playful as
Jane, the sexy adulteress who gives sound advice to the blabbering Ben: 'I
already have a husband. I don't need another,' but her character is shown only
intermittently. The relationship between Ben and his wife is well depicted but
lacking in weight - they seem to drift in their lives without divulging many of
their emotions or feelings. Perhaps that is the point, but it is not dealt with
greater depth. There's a beautiful moment where Ben's wife sees her daughter
riding a bicycle and she, for a moment, feels inner peace. Then she starts to
ride a bike to feel some sense of "liberation." It's a terrific moment and it
is one of the few moments to really strike an emotional chord.
 Cinematographer Frederick Elmes ("Blue Velvet") does an astounding job of
depicting this world with dark blue tones for the night scenes, and graying
clouds making the days seems colorless. I love they way he dramatizes the
ensuing ice storm complete with close-ups of a train's icy wheels making
contact with icy rails, and the frozen icicles on the tree's leaves. Ang Lee
also enhances the oncoming climate with the constant weather reports of the
danger ahead. This is also meant as a metaphor for the troubling family
relations in New Canaan. But where's the drama? 
"The Ice Storm" is a very fine film and it is exquisitely made. It also has a
wonderful cast, but it's often devoid of genuine feeling - the sentimental
ending (parents can redeem themselves through their children) negates the
somber, enigmatic mood that preceded it. If the film opted to tell its story
from the point-of-view of Christina Ricci, then this would have been a more
complete picture of 1970's family life. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or
Faust667@aol.com 

Author
Walter Frith
The most disappointing thing about 'The Ice Storm' is that despite the 
strength of its characters, it is a tediously flat and unoriginal film that 
breaks no new ground in exploring marital infidelity, adolescents coming 
of age or the human condition in general.  
Based on the novel by Rick Moody and scripted by James Schamus, it's 
set in New Caanan, Connecticut in 1973. 'The Ice Storm' begins as the 
story of a middle class family headed by Kevin Kline and Joan Allen who 
have two children.  Kline is having an affair with his next door neighbour 
(Sigourney Weaver) while Allen confronts her own suspicions about the 
affair.  Their daughter (Christina Ricci) is a socially aware adolescent 
who follows the Watergate hearings with great enthusiasm.  All the 
adolescents in this film begin exploring sex, drugs and rebellion against 
their parental authority figures.    
After looking hard at the film what struck me most curiously is why would 
you make a film audiences have seen over and over again? Director Ang 
Lee ('Sense and Sensibility') tries to build a film with intense dramatic 
overtones with little or no music score, starkly bleak camera work which 
in fairness is appropriate for the depressing conditions of the main 
characters lives but although I enjoy motion pictures which don't have 
the conventional happy endings (and I'm not giving away the ending by 
saying this) this film puts no new spin on creating any difference in the 
film whether its the opening ten minutes or the final ten minutes.  The 
tone and character portrayals are unmoving for the film's entire running 
time.  
The only thing slightly unique about the film is the concept of wife 
swapping.  At an adult party in the film, men put their car keys in a bowl 
and at the end of the night, women fish out a pair of keys and go home 
with the owners of that set.  I once saw a half hour episode of 'All in the 
Family' which explored this issue in a deeper and much more meaningful,  
entertaining manner.
'The Ice Storm' isn't a bad film, it just didn't strike a nerve with me and 
perhaps that fact the its dramatic shadows are so hard to spot, it might 
have played better with a couple of re-writes.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Bill Chambers
starring Kevin Kline, Joan Allen, Christina Ricci, Sigourney Weaver,
Tobey Maguire
written by James Schamus, based on Rick Moody's novel
directed by Ang Lee
Allow me, for a few sentences, to slam PLAYING GOD, the new David
Duchovny vehicle, for there is a relative purpose. Both PLAYING GOD
and THE ICE STORM begin with narration, but the only the latter gets
it right. In GOD, Duchovny blandly sets up the tale over the opening
titles in voice over, telling us that he's a doctor, that he's had his
license suspended because of a drug addiction, that he's going to the
nightclub we're craning down on to score some drugs, and that
sometimes life throws curve balls. What follows is this: a scene in
which David Duchovny buys drugs; a scene in which Duchovny is thrown a
curve ball (he performs emergency surgery in the nightclub); a scene
in which Duchovny does drugs; and a flashback in which Duchovny screws
up an operation. So, if we were going to see all of that, anyway, why
did first time hack Andy Wilson choose to have his lead spell it out
for us? The answer, dare I venture, lies within the hearts of bad
directors, who believe the audiences are as stupid as themselves.
THE ICE STORM, on the other, begins with young actor Tobey Maguire
sitting on an empty, stopped train reading a comic book, at which
point his voice over kicks in.  Poetically, he compares family life to
"The Fantastic Four", without giving away a single moment of what
we're about to see. So there, the most tired, lazy device in motion
pictures doesn't have to be tired and lazy; narration can tell us what
the picture's about without telegraphing the plot.
Many such moments in THE ICE STORM are poetic. The story takes place
in 1973, at the sunset of the sexual revolution. Kline plays the
harried husband of Allen (who is excellent as a frigid wife and mother
again, but it's time to stretch those acting muscles) and father of
two (Ricci and Maguire). While he spends his days in the bed of the
also- cheating neighbour Weaver, his children begin to adopt similar
behaviour. Ricci is a sexually adventurous fourteen-year-old who
flirts with both of Weaver's sons (Adam Hann-Bird and Elijah
Wood). His son is away at private school hatching a plan to bed the
class beauty before his studlier roommate does.
Their actions are motivated by more than their libido, however. There
is a shared desperation for communication and contact among them,
paralyzed by their own unhappiness in the "perfect" suburban
neighbourhood. Despite its subject matter, THE ICE STORM never lapses
into satire nor does it mock its characters, even as it gently pokes
fun at their various predicaments. Suburbia in most films, like EDWARD
SCISSORHANDS or WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE, is portrayed as a white
picket fence surrounding a dozen Addams families. THE ICE STORM is
less eager to impress us with quirky kinfolk; it places the two
neighbouring families under a microscope and asks us to perform our
own examinations.
So subtly portrayed are these characters, so evenly directed is this
film, that I found myself appreciating the experience of watching it,
even if I wasn't bedazzled by it at the moment.  This is the kind of
film that gets under your skin; the next morning it was all I could
think about. Even the downplayed tragedy of the ending--the effects of
the titular storm-- seemed twice as powerful the next day.
THE ICE STORM upstages all movies about dysfunctional families because
it's unself- conscious. Witty without being jokey, sad without being
blatently tearjerking, this is the sort of film that may be so
realistic and unforgiving audiences will stay away in droves.
More reviews to be found at the fascinating inept website:
"Film Freak Central"--
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Set/7504
Feel free to sign that ridiculous guestbook!

Author
Nicholas Amado
The events of Ice Storm unfold over the span of Thanksgiving weekend in
Connecticut, 1973. The title is both a literal component of the film as well
as a metaphor for what we see within the characters. Ang Lee (director of
Sense and Sensibility) puts together a marvelously chilling, darkest of dark,
seriocomic melodrama. The characters all have two lives, one with their
families, the other a dark chamber within their own minds that controls each
of them. Stellar performances, and expert camerawork and cinematography round
out this look at the lives of the nuclear families in the early '70's.
The main characters are comprised of two sets of parents, each with two
children. All of them, in one form or another explore their own sexuality.
The children, ranging from age 12 to age 17 are the most experimental, especia
lly Wendy (Christina Ricci) who at the age of 17 is a nymphomaniac in
training. We come to understand that each child has his or her own emotional
problems linked to their disfunctional parents. While the folks are off at
swingers parties, the children are left alone, free to explore themselves and
each other. Though the parents often discover the acts as they occur, they
are never seriously scolding, but rather passive. It left me with a very cold
feeling, as does much of the film. The parents, who obviously love their
children, never seem to know exactly how to handle them, and all of the
communication in the past has been fluff, never really getting to the heart
of the matter. In one scene, Ben (Kevin Kline) attempts to explain to his son
the nature of sexuality, but, unable to find the right words, he downgrades
to talking about masturbation, until he finally drops the subject entierely,
asking his son not to tell anyone what he had just said.
There is an icy chill between all the characters as each of them interacts.
The children have no substantial connection with their parents, the two young
brothers have  an non-aggressive, but uncaring relationship. The adults all
have problems with each other because of their personal agendas. The film is
coated with different cold images, mostly of ice being broken in an ice tray,
or frozen, crystalized trees and electrical wires. The interlacing of the
literal storyline  the visual icy metaphor is incredibly well done. Any warm
or cozy shot is broken in one way or another by ice or by coldness. Comfort
between characters is never long-lasting. No one in the film is quite as
chilling as Jane, played convincingly by Sigourney Weaver. In her attempt at
explaining sex to her neighbors' child, she begins to go off on a tangent
about how Samoan children are sent off to the wild until they learn a thing
or two. After sex with her adulterous neighbor Ben, she tells him that she
"already has a husband" when he is talking to her about golf.
Christina Ricci gives the best performance among a very talented cast. She
plays the daughter of Kevin Kline and Joan Allen. She is always in control,
does as she pleases, and never seems upset about disturbing events. 
There are a number of funny situations in Ice Storm, but overall, this is a
deep, disturbing look at two families. One may want to compare it to Ordinary
People, the Academy Award winning film of 1980. But though there are
similarities in terms of the "disturbed child" and the freezing finale, these
two films are distinctly different, and Ice Storm is much more compelling.
Ordinary People succeeds at its attempts at occasional warmth. Ice Storm
never makes those attempts. It is a dreary but moving drama with fantastic
visuals, done to cinematic perfection.
3 1/2 out of 4 stars
Copyright (C) Nicholas Amado

Author
James Berardinelli
THE ICE STORM
(Fox Searchlight)
Starring:  Kevin Kline, Joan Allen, Christina Ricci, Sigourney Weaver,
Elijah Wood, Adam Hann-Byrd, Toby Maguire.
Screenplay:  James Schamus, based on the novel by Rick Moody.
Producers:  Ted Hope, James Schamus and Ang Lee.
Director:  Ang Lee.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, sexual situations, adult themes)
Running Time:  115 minutes
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Brutally obvious "message" film-making just doesn't get more
effective and entertaining than Ang Lee's THE ICE STORM.  Continuing the
trend of "Me Decade" venality-bashing begun by BOOGIE NIGHTS, it tells the
tale of two troubled families in suburban New Canaan, Connecticut circa
Thanksgiving 1973.  Ben Hood (Kevin Kline) is having an affair with his
next-door neighbor Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver) though neither one is
sure exactly why; Ben's wife Elena (Joan Allen) tries not to acknowledge
that she suspects anything.  Meanwhile, 14-year-old Wendy Hood (Christina
Ricci) experiments sexually with both of Janey's sons, Mike (Elijah Wood)
and Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd), while Wendy's older brother Paul (Toby
Maguire) tries to find a girl who isn't more interested in his prep school
roommate Francis (David Krumholtz).
     It takes no time at all to figure out that THE ICE STORM is meant as
a critical study of an era when all sense of stability and authority were
crumbling in America.  With the Watergate scandal in full flower, parents
dabbling in wife-swapping and even the local minister (Michael Cumpsty)
given to flirting with his flock, the film's young characters are left to
fumble for their moral way without a compass.  When the parents actually
do attempt to offer guidance, it proves worse than useless.  Janey catches
Wendy and Sandy together, then launches into a lecture which somehow
drifts into primitive anthropology; Ben's years-too-late facts of life
speech to Paul primarily covers "self-abuse" in the shower.  James
Schamus' script (adapted from Rick Moody's novel) makes it abundantly
clear that plenty of important things were left unsaid while suburban
parents of the 1970s were trying to be pals with their kids and "find
themselves."
     It is a credit both to the exceptional cast and to Schamus' finely
detailed script that THE ICE STORM doesn't come off like exactly the kind
of lecture those teenagers desperately needed.  Moments of cringe-inducing
awkwardness -- the tentative sexual games of youth, ill-advised romantic
advances, foolish attempts to recapture the irresponsibility of girlhood
-- spill off the screen as characters scramble aimlessly in search of some
sort of fulfillment.  Particularly vivid is the exploration of teen
sexuality, energized by the frank performances of Ricci, Wood and
Hann-Byrd.  The treatment is neither exploitative nor ignorant,
recognizing adolescents as far from the neutered creatures represented by
Sandy's G.I. Joe action figure.  Every performer turns in funny,
provocative work, adding layers of confusion, yearning and desperation to
a story which easily could have become pedantic.
     THE ICE STORM only gets clumsy in the scenes involving Paul, whose
infatuation with a wealthy New York girl is the stuff of over-earnest
coming of age dramas.  Toby Maguire has an affable charm, but his
character never feels fully integrated into the story; he's a nice-guy
throwback whose acts of conscience function primarily as counterpoint to
the mistakes made by the rest of his family.  His physical remove from the
action does end up working wonderfully in the powerful conclusion,
however, as tragedy forces characters to face up to their self-absorption
and realize what matters to them most.  It's an obvious lesson, perhaps,
but one delivered with skill and grace.  All family values sermons should
be this haunting and insightful.

Author
James Berardinelli
United States, 1997
U.S. Release Date: beginning 10/97 (limited)
Running Length: 1:52
MPAA Classification: R (Sexual situations, profanity)
Theatrical Aspect Ratio: 1.85:1
Cast: Kevin Kline, Sigourney Weaver, Joan Allen, Tobey Maguire, 
      Christina Ricci, Jamey Sheridan, Elijah Wood
Director: Ang Lee
Producers: James Schamus, Ted Hope, Ang Lee 
Screenplay: James Schamus based on the novel by Rick Moody 
Cinematography: Frederick Elmes
Music: Mychael Danna
U.S. Distributor: Fox Searchlight
     Perceptive is the best single word I can come up with to describe 
THE ICE STORM, Ang Lee's near-masterpiece that deconstructs the American 
family.  For, although the film is provocative, entertaining, and 
impeccably crafted, its greatest strength is its ability to convey 
truths that lie deep beneath the surface.  THE ICE STORM is perceptive 
about people, relationships, and human nature, and there's not a single 
moment in the entire 112 minute running length that rings false.  
     Back in the early '90s, the Taiwan-born Lee had a pair of art house 
hits, THE WEDDING BANQUET and EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN, that brought him 
international acclaim.  Then, in 1994, Lee was selected to helm Emma 
Thompson's adaptation of Jane Austen's SENSE AND SENSIBILITY.  The film, 
which was released in 1995, earned multiple Academy Award nominations 
and ensured that Lee would never again be relegated to obscurity.  For 
his followup to SENSE, Lee chose THE ICE STORM, and the accomplished 
result points to a director who has matured in every way.
     THE ICE STORM takes place during Thanksgiving week, 1973, in New 
Canaan, Connecticut.  On the political front, the nation was still 
bathed in the aftermath of Vietnam and President Nixon's regime was 
beginning to crumble as the Watergate situation escalated.  With trust 
in the government giving way to cynicism and disillusionment, it was the 
end of an era.  It was also the beginning of a time when the stability 
of the family began to waver, with the divorce rate skyrocketing to its 
current level of 50% and children being forced to cope with the reality 
that their father and mother might not always be together.
     The Hood family, like so many others of the time, is dysfunctional, 
even though it doesn't appear to be.  Paul (Tobey Maguire) is an average 
16-year old off at prep school learning about Dostoevsky in the 
classroom and the difficulties of romance outside of it.  His younger 
sister, Wendy (Christina Ricci) is a restless 14-year old, intensely 
curious about sexual matters, and willing to explore them beyond the 
bounds of prudence and propriety.  Paul and Wendy's parents, Ben and 
Elena (Kevin Kline and Joan Allen) appear at first glance to be the 
perfect mother and father.  But their perfection is a sham, and while 
Ben dallies with a willing neighbor (Sigourney Weaver), Elena stews in 
her own loneliness.
     THE ICE STORM examines the unstable dynamic of the family in a 
constantly-changing world.  It's a coming of age tale that shows how the 
discoveries and development of the parents parallel those of their 
children, and suggests that age doesn't always equate to understanding.  
Sexually and socially, everyone in this film is groping for answers, 
whether their age is fourteen or forty.  In fact, it could be argued 
that the teenagers have a clearer and healthier approach to sexuality 
than their elders.  More often than not, the children in THE ICE STORM 
are open about what they want.  The adults, on the other hand, feel the 
need to resort to deception and wife-swapping games to achieve the same 
ends.
     The title refers to a massive late-November ice storm that blankets 
New Canaan with a frozen glaze.  Not only is the storm crucial to the 
film's resolution, but its vivid presentation makes it almost a 
character in its own right as it coats trees, power lines, and streets 
with ice and turns the world into a beautiful-but-deadly place.  (From a 
technical standpoint, it's amazing to note that Lee created the winter 
wonderland without any help from Mother Nature -- as credible as 
everything looks, none of the ice is real.)
     Every character in this film is interesting, and it's a pleasure to 
spend time with each of them.  No one here is perfect, and we're 
presented with finely-detailed portraits of flesh-and-blood human 
beings, with their strengths and weaknesses laid bare.  All of the 
various relationships are likewise intricately developed:  brother and 
sister, husbands and wives, parents and children, teenagers and their 
would-be sex partners, and men and women having affairs.  It's amazing 
how real these characters are, and how profoundly engrossing such a 
simple story can be.  
     Lee accurately captures the "feel" of the early '70s, which is 
ironic since, during the year when THE ICE STORM transpires, he didn't 
speak English and hadn't yet set foot in America.  However, for those of 
us who lived through that era, there are plenty of familiar images and 
items.  Some, like the bellbottoms, wide-collared shirts, and gas-
guzzling cars, are expected.  Others, like the bubble umbrella and the 
anti-pollution TV spot featuring a crying Native American, show that Lee 
was willing to take things to another level of detail.  While it's true 
that THE ICE STORM may not represent the reality of the '70s, it 
effectively fits our memories of the time.
     The lead performances are all terrific.  Kevin Kline elicits 
feelings of sympathy and scorn for the loutish Ben.  Joan Allen imbues 
her character with enough humanity to keep Elena from being reduced to a 
stereotypical martyr.  Tobey Maguire is believable as the kind of guy 
that girls always see as the brotherly type.  Then there's Christina 
Ricci, one of the best actresses of her generation, finally getting a 
chance to show what she can do in a good motion picture (some of her 
less-than-impressive previous credits include two ADDAMS FAMILY movies, 
CASPER, NOW AND THEN, and THAT DARN CAT!).  As expected, Ricci doesn't 
let us down -- her interpretation of Wendy is knowing, intense, and 
nuanced.  
     I have heard complaints that the trailer for THE ICE STORM makes 
the film look uninvolving.  If that's true, it does this fine motion 
picture a great disservice.  Then again, it's always difficult to 
effectively represent a drama using two minutes of clips.  THE ICE 
STORM's impact cannot be conveyed in such a short span -- this is a 
movie that needs to be seen in its entirety.  The experience will be 
more than worth the investment in time.  THE ICE STORM is at times 
funny, poignant, moving, and sensitive -- but, no matter what, it's 
always perceptive.
The website has moved!!
The new address is: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"The cinema is not an art which films life: the cinema is something between
art and life. Unlike painting and literature, the cinema both gives to life
and takes from it..."

Author
D. Scholin
The Ice Storm is that rare thing among the films disgorged each year
from the United States: it is genuinely well-made. There are many things
to like about it and some things which will leave the seasoned viewer in
awe. Aong them are the razor-sharp photography aware of its own
symbolism; the unpretty psycho-sexual verisimilitude; the beautifully
detailed interiors of houses, conveying a strong nostalgia for a time -
the seventies - when people did not so much lack a sense of style as
'suffer from style to a paralysing extent' (a useful judgement on the
70s I read recently in an art magazine).
The story concerns two neighbouring professional families in the
north-east of the United States, the Hoods and the Carvers. The eldest
son of one family, a beautiful and dreamy, uncertain boy of perhaps
fourteen, is killed at the climax of the film and his death is clearly a
punishment brought upon the adulterous and self-absorbed parents of the
respective houses. The fact that this terrible event is the crux of the
film suggests to me that Ang Lee is less interested in post-sixties
infidelity as a theme (it's been done before, as Kevin Kline would
remember well) than in the idea of the difficulty of socialising
children in an amoral culture. This raises questions in turn about the
possibility of 'growing up' at all in such a culture: bad behaviour
spans the generations easily and makes them hard to tell apart. Parents
in the film are adolescents encased in the ungainly shells of their own
authority. They lumber about suffused with the bitterness of having
missed the main chance romantically, which is the key to their
adolescent optimism regarding the possibilities of delight contained in
sex. 
The adults' extramarital foolings-about are not half so poignant as
their inability to give direction or, it seems, comfort to their
children. The boys - and one girl, played by Nina Ricci with her white
face, dark-circled eyes and scarlet, unsatisfied mouth - muddle through
their desires in scenes that are gothic in their uncanniness. This
disturbance comes about by setting human behaviours that are essential
and pre-cultural in the glamorous, soothing domestic interiors of
American modernity and the grey-white starkness of the Connecticut
landscape in late autumn. Whenever the teenagers come together in this
film, it is like discovering the thing that we know must be true but
will not admit is true. Ang Lee seems to be pursuing something akin to
the humourist P J O'Rourke's stipulation that for true horror we need a
clash of homeliness and frank atavism: 'It has to be Mom eating snakes
in the rec room.' The film stirs in its audience the anxiety that the
pan of experience, exotic sets and decor notwithstanding, must be
shallow indeed for these confrontations, upsets and refusals to feel so
familiar, for their acid to cut so deeply. And yet the chief delight of
the film is its delivery to us of privileged access to the players'
mostly grim sexual adventures. No-one in the ensemble, least of all any
of the youths, seems to mind being exposed utterly to us.
The plot evenly divides the time we spend with the parents and the time
we spend with their offspring. We are invited both to laugh drily with
the adults who like one another so little and to quiver with the
adolescents who never seem far from biting one another with the urgency
of erotic need. But the problem, of course, is that moving from one
group to another is like trekking back and forth across the wintry wood
that is shown several times to separate the neighbouring houses. The
idea of a gulf between the generations is best shown when Wendy Hood,
flustered by the entreaties of next-door neighbour Mikey Carver,
collects herself afterward in a gesture of sexual bullying: she entices
Mikey's younger brother, Sandy, who adores her, into a show-and-tell of
genitalia. Sandy agrees, and they crowd together into the gleaming
Carver bathroom. But face to face, it is too much for Sandy who, 
hyperventilating with anxiety, suddenly rejects the terms of the game
with a cry of confused horror. We are shown with brutal economy that
neither child is child enough to play such a game without cost. The
moment is not comical; it is ugly in the feeling it generates of
innocence having been trashed for no gain. The Ice Storm is serious
about sex in a way American cinema almost never is, for its moralism
never attempts to fool us with the absurdity of suggesting that we could
succeed in avoiding 'bad' or 'coercive' sex: the suffering and anomie is
built into the driving need. Banished in disgrace by Sigourney Weaver's
halter-necked temptress after her misplaced power-play, Wendy stomps
home. Kevin Kline, in the character of Ben Hood, the genially interested
buffoon that he remains for much of the story, meets her on the stairs
and asks her what she has done today. 'Nothing', she says, as any
teenager might. It, like much of the film, is a beautifully managed
exercise in suspending the audience between two utterly divergent points
of view, showing the cold distances that lie underneath one roof.
The director Ang Lee, if not just the author of the novel that provided
the film's narrative, has a keen sense of the rupture between mind and
body that occurs at puberty. You could say that this rupture is the
moment of being initiated into the ordeal of the civilised West. We have
no external signs for it (or only inauthentic ones), and our parents
seem unable to prepare us for it, but it is a transition one must make
in order to be an adult in the West. Maturity in our culture is a
willingness to make instruments of our bodies, to become comfortable
with a life of 'self-actualisation' and its curious internalisation of
the master-slave relation (a good idea of Baudrillard's, not mine).
There is a finely-photographed metaphor for the rupture in the shot of
Mikey, the dreamy, non-earthed elder son of the Carvers, wobbling at the
end of a diving board slicked in wet ice, testing it for bounce above an
emptied swimming pool in the wind and freezing rain of the ice storm.
Earlier we have seen Mikey and Wendy kiss one another passionately in
this desolate pit, as it fills with dead leaves. Mikey desires her
desperately, the film makes it clear, but he seems also to be suspicious
of bodies and the corruption that goes on inside them, even if it is
only rot at the level of the molecule. Smelling, he reads to his class
from a homework sheet, is really like tasting, in that to smell
something is to 'eat' the molecule that creates the odour. So, he
concludes, think twice about what is happening when you smell another
person's shit . On the night of the storm, Mikey tells Sandy that he is
going out into the freezing air because the cold kills off all smells,
and the air, being free of these molecules, is 'clean'. We know
immediately that this sweet-natured, quietly morbid youth is going to
die. 
Many details glint appealingly among the heavy works of the larger
themes in The Ice Storm. For the long familiarity of siblings, there is
Wendy's often absent elder brother, Paul, whose train ride from home to
a friend's place and back frames the story, seeing at once that his
younger sister has nabbed a record from his collection by a tell-tale
scratch that makes the needle jump in a certain place as she plays it.
For the staleness of nuptial bliss, there are the buffeting waves of a
water bed which threaten to toss its occupants on the floor when one
sits on it, in a revenge of creature comforts bought in gayer, sillier
times. For the horror of a dead son that Mikey's mother must confront on
the morning after the storm, there is no confrontation at all: Sigourney
Weaver's long elegant face only emerges from sleep in close-up, to the
hoarse, nightmare-indistinct sound of her husband weeping at the other
end of the house.
Daring ellipsis is one of the marks of a masterly director (think of
the totally elided, because completely predictable, court case of the
young murderer in Kieslowski's A Short Film About Killing), and it is
pleasing when it occurs not only for its economy but because of its
complicty with the audience. Lee is not going to bludgeon us with the
obvious; instead, recurrently in The Ice Storm, there are breath-taking
turns; turn after turn. There is a turn in the playing out of Mikey's
death, but the most haunting of all is at another point altogether, and
its nature I will spare you. It terminates the film in such a
devastating way because of its surprise - not an intrusive or jarring
one, since it only magnifies the point being made, but a sheerly formal
beauty of a turn, like the appearance of the pressed flower in the last
seconds of Kiarostami's Where is My Friend's House - lifting and
breaking the heart. 
Why more fuss has not been made over The Ice Storm baffles me. I can
only assume that the American public has been brutalised by Hollywood,
and cannot assimilate the complexity and precision of Lee's work. A
palate scorched daily by jalapeno peppers will not recognise a
translucent burgundy: such tastes will need time and training to
acquire. Until then know only that this film is evidence of just how
fine American cinema could become - if it wanted to.

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 18 October 1997 with Linda at the Lincoln Plaza Cinemas (birthday
outing for me)
Seen again on 7 November 1997 with Andrea at the same theatre ($17.00)
(her birthday outing)
What exactly is an ice storm? Well, it's the sort of storm that is warm
enough to let it rain but cold enough to let everything freeze. Even the
tiniest tree twigs are covered in heavy, thick ice, that allows you to see
the living thing it encases.
The year is 1973, Nixon is trying vainly to defend himself, and life
follows its dysfunctional pace for two families in well-off New Canaan,
Connecticut. What is truly dysfunctional in the movie is authority.
President Nixon is clearly on the decline, as are the parents in the
movie; they rarely know what is going on in their parents' lives, and the
feeling is mutual. When Jim Carver (Jamey Sheridan) returns from a
business trip and announces his arrival, his alienated son Mikey (Elijah
Wood) says, "You were gone?"
The backdrop of the 1970s does make for  a lot of lighthearted
moments--toe socks, garish interior decor, hideous fashions, and
wife-swapping; but there is a deep sadness and disturbing feeling
throughout *The Ice Storm*. Ang Lee makes wonderful use of silence and
music in between the poignant moments of dialogue. 
The Hoods and the Carvers have a variety of problems. Ben Hood (Kevin
Kline) barely knows how to talk with anyone in his family and is having an
affair with Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver). Elena Hood (Joan Allen) looks
like a completely stressed out Michelle Pfeiffer, as she envies her
daughter's freedom and fends off the advances of the pastor. Jim Carver is
almost completely clueless to everything going on around him. 
The children fare no better. They are as empty and joyless as their
parents. Wendy Hood (Christina Ricci) shows a sexual precociousness with
the two Carver boys, while her brother has to fend for himself at private
school, tortured by his own virginity as his roommate makes the moves on
every girl he wants for himself.
*The Ice Storm* is one of the best movies I have seen in a long time. All
the performances are great (Christina Ricci stands out in particular), and
the direction, music, and settings all underscore the film's basic themes
of longing, emptiness, loneliness, and sadness. The 1970s kitsch and the
many quirky and humorous moments keep the movie from being overwrought.
Director Ang Lee's short filmography includes *Sense and Sensibility*
(1995), *Yinshi nan nu* (1994 -- aka *Eat Drink Man Woman*), *Hsi Yen*
(1993 -- *The Wedding Banquet*), *Tui Shou* (1992 -- aka *Pushing Hands*,
all of which are wonderfully made and highly entertaining. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Luke Buckmaster
There is nothing more compelling then watching a think about it film; and its
obvious that director John Genry wanted to give us something distinguished to
contemplate in his latest epic The Ice Storm.
Set in the mutable period of the 1970s, sexual and sociable change takes place
between adults and children who dont realize the full repercussions of their
actions. Thus a storm brews, but this films focus is definitely not on the
harsh weather that adds to (but does not make) the icy cold feel from start to
end.
Ben Hood (Kevin Kline) is having an affair with Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver)
behind the back of wife Elena (Joan Allen), who is trying not to notice the
obvious signs that their marriage is falling apart.  Meanwhile their 14-year-old
daughter Wendy (Christina Ricci) is testing the limits of adolescents by
sexually experimenting with both Janeys sons Mike (Elijah Wood) and Sandy (Adam
Hann-Byrd).
Wendys older brother Paul (Toby Maguire) narrates the story, and at the same
time pursues his own sexual interests and desire to lose his virginity; chasing
a local girl with no idea how to achieve, well, what he is after.
When Ben and Elenas relationship begins to fall about, and they attend a
partner swapping party, many issues about a changing society are raised.
Sometimes the shepherd needs the comfort of the sheep, the town reverend
states to Janey. I'm going to try hard not to understand the implications of
that, she replies.
A chain of events occur to all the main characters where they desire something,
yet their selfish cravings hurt others around them and cause breakdowns in
people  and situations (and very occasionally, the film).  Whilst these
character relationships can be crowned as The Ice Storms greatest asset, many
would also argue them to be its most obvious weakness.  This is due to the
shallow and emotionless feelings that the characters portray - its almost as if
John Genry wants us not to care for them.  If only he had taken the risk of
veering the plot off the straight and narrow path that The Ice Storm
continuously follows - perhaps then we would truly have a classic to be
remembered.
With the exceptions of Ben Hoods only outburst of emotion and relationship
problems between the married couples, the films unique style is often to avoid
direct conflicts between characters yet at the same time make the scenes feel
tense and neurotic.
Please dont get me wrong - The Ice Storm is a rare experience and its
excellence will appeal to many audiences, but if you are not interested in what
youve heard from me so far there is little chance that the film will please
you.
As to the amount of fulfillment the icy cold characters can give is purely a
matter of opinion.  I would, however, go as far to say that they appear to be so
emotionless that when the film rears its frosty behind into tragic and climatic
situations, we are left staring blankly at the screen, hoping that its next move
would be a show of emotion that lasts more than 30 seconds.
Thankfully, The Ice Storm never makes the same fatal mistake featured in films
such as Her Majesty Mrs Brown, where the films main focus is an attempt at a
loving relationship that ends up looking detestable and off putting.  No  this
film is put together carefully and sharply, where the main message is definitely
something intended to make you think.
Although the film ends up splintering itself by the very foundations that makes
it unique, The Ice Storm is an intriguing story of change and transformation
inside a world of harsh realities and consequences.


Author
Tim Voon
Starring: Kevin Kline, Joan Allen, Christina Ricci, Sigourney Weaver,
Elijah Wood, Adam Hann-Byrd, Toby Maguire. Screenplay: James Schamus,
based on the novel by Rick Moody. Director: Ang Lee.
On Thanksgiving weekend, winter 1973, there's more than just a blizzard
blowing in New Canaan Connecticut. There's a plenty married adults
having extra-marital affairs, a plenty children experimenting with their
bodies and tragedy waiting to erupt from the eye of the storm. If Ang
Lee wanted us to feel the coldness of the changing climate, then he has
succeeded in giving as a good bout of frostbite  everything from the
weather to the décor to the relationships are meticulously frigid and
marvellously frozen.
During the course of the movie the subject of a key chain party is
raised. When my companion asked me what this was I answered, Well I
think it's when they pick a key out of the bowl, and they get to test
drive each others cars.' Boy was I wrong. To think that grownups behaved
so in the decade when I was born made me worry about the conduct of my
own parents. So I went home and I interrogated them and they of course
denied any knowledge of such tomfoolery. But one wonders?
This movie is also about the childhood discovery of sex. Everybody finds
out sometime, some younger, some older and some not all. Knowledge is
obtained through dirty magazines, accidentally walking in on your sister
in the shower and of course first hand. In this movie, Ang Lee decides
to explore the themes by allowing the kids to have a peek at each others
pee pee, with suggestions of touching and tasting, then stripping a toy
soldier to look at it's pee pee also, before just getting plain naked.
It sounds offensive, but with Ang Lee's placid form of directing 
you'll probably just raise an eyebrow.
Needless to say the characters are very much in need of love and not
sex. Using the cold climate to his advantage, Lee shows us what life is
like, why it needs to change and then gives his conclusion. Kevin Kline
is purely dramatic in this movie as the unfaithful husband  a nice
change of pace for him. Joan Allen is every bit the sweet wife she was
in the movie FACE/OFF, and Sigourney Weaver every bit the vamp we
despised in WORKING GIRL  - 70's style of course. However, the praise
for fine acting also belongs to the children. Christina Ricci is as good
a child actress as they come, and in this movie she hones in on her tart
qualities. Elijah Wood seems to be perpetually trapped in roles
requiring wide-eye innocence and perhaps needs to develop a mean streak
or two. Any ways, I hope these two young actors manage an easy
transition from child to adult star without incident, for they are
amongst my favourite.
So if you like stories about complex relationships and in depth
character development, then you have found the movie in THE ICE STORM.
Nobody does movies on character driven situations better than Mr Lee.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
Story of two families living in Connecticut in the 1970s. The unemotional
husband and wife duos don't seem to have much spark left in their marriage,
like to drink and cheat. This improper umbilical cord introduces their kids
to the wonderfully insecure world of their adolescence without much moral or
parental guidance. Adults only, please.
CRITIQUE:
Interesting at times, boring at others, this character study semi-succeeds
in portraying a couple of dysfunctional nuclear clans, with solid
performances by all of its stars, especially the kids, despite its
occasional overly existential moments. Everyone in this movie is quite cold
and distant, appreciated to an extent by all who have gone through some
downer periods in their own lives, but hard to swallow for those who look
for entertainment in films. In that sense, this film is not recommended to
those who are looking for fun and amusement, despite a couple of curiously
unserious scenes. This film is meant for the higher-browed people who enjoy
watching others bemoan their lifeless journeys, contemplate a sack of sins,
and live in complete dysfunction among one another (Woody Allen, eat your
heart out!). Depressed yet? No, check out this film!
The writing is very good, most of the characters well-drawn and the look of
the film, unique and appropriate. I did find the pacing to be a little too
slow for my own jive, and bothered by the TITANIC-esque annoying flutes
passing off as the score, but all in all, an interesting study of human
beings attempting to differentiate themselves from the kingdom of the
animals.


Author
James Sanford
In Suburbia, circa 1973, however, most of the principals in "The Ice
Storm" seem content to follow the lyrics of the Hombres' hit and "let
it all hang out." Even the young reverend attends a local swingers'
party, noting (via a scary metaphor) that "sometimes the shepherd
needs the company of the sheep."
Everyone who wants company seems to find it. Ben Hood (Kevin
Kline) carries on a dead-end affair with neighbor Jane (Sigourney
Weaver), the quintessential bored housewife, who rejects Ben's
attempts at afterglow intimacy. "I have a husband," she snaps. "I
don't particularly feel the need for another." Ben's teenage daughter
Wendy (the brilliant Christina Ricci, a long way from "Casper" and
"That Darn Cat") makes time with both of Jane's sons, the overly
sensitive Mikey (Elijah Wood) and the twisted Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd),
a budding psycho who graduates from blowing up toy planes to savaging
rose bushes with a whip. Even Ben's wife Elena (Joan Allen), after a
failed attempt to release her pent-up sexual tension through
shoplifting, begins looking for a more satisfying outlet.
The irony, of course, is that even though there's plenty of
physical togetherness, emotionally everyone is on their own
channel. And, often it seems as if director Ang Lee is purposely
keeping these needy characters at arm's length as well, and his
frequent cutaways to shots of ice cubes, ice cube trays and ice
buckets are not exactly the most subtle way to let us know what he
thinks of the residents of New Canaan.
But "The Ice Storm" is most effective at capturing the
desperately hip attitude that seemed to hang like incense smoke around
upper-middle-class/lower-middle-age adults in the early years of the
Me Decade. From the huge Peter Pan collars that sprout from the shirts
of the men to bedside copies of "Watership Down" and "When She Was
Good," Lee's film is a catalogue of scary '70's trendiness, and it
climaxes with a wife-swapping "key party" ("one of those California
things," a participant notes, excitedly) that today seems as peculiar
as an Aztec ceremony. Somehow in the wake of AIDS, it's easier to
relate to the sexually repressive atmosphere of "The Wings of the
Dove" than the wildly self-indulgent free-for-alls of "The Ice Storm."
James Sanford

Author
Steve Rhodes
     It's frequently the small details that make the difference between
a good picture and an outstanding one.  Director Ang Lee (SENSE AND
SENSIBILITY, EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN, and THE WEDDING BANQUET) is a master
at the minutia of story telling.
     In THE ICE STORM, set in an unhappy period of the early 1970s when
the sexual revolution and the Watergate scandal were both in full
swing, Lee uses close-ups of a metaphor-laden metal ice tray to tell
the story.  The adults in the film, and to lesser extent the teenagers,
are as cold to each other as ice, and each will be broken in many ways
before their melancholy story ends.
     "Ben, you're boring me," complains Sigourney Weaver as a harsh
looking Janey Carver to a tired and befuddled Kevin Kline as her lover
and neighbor Ben Hood.  "I have a husband.  I don't have a need for
another one."  You see, he has committed the cardinal sin of talking
seriously to her after their regularly scheduled tryst.  She is there
for sex and is put off by the effrontery of his speaking to her.  James
Schamus's script based on the novel by Rick Moody is dead-on in this
scene as in all the others.
     Carol Oditz's costumes and Michael Bigger's make-up gives the
early 70s an accurate but exceedingly ugly look.  Never have long
lapels and gaudy leisure suits looked worse.  Only Joan Allen, who
steals the show as Ben's repressed wife Elena, manages to look good in
her hairspray-hardened coiffure.  A fragile statuette who looks ever in
danger of cracking, she plays a wife who tries to ignore her husband's
infidelities even as she yearns for some of her own.  Like all of the
other characters, she is massively unhappy with her life.  Kleptomania
turns out to be her method for sexual arousal.
     Mark Friedberg's sets for the film are set in a depressingly gray
and leafless New Canaan, Conn.  The days are short and cold as a bleak
winter approaches.  Again, metaphors abound.
     Along with the adults' preoccupation with sex, the kids are
beginning to experiment.  And I do mean experiment.  Christina Ricci,
as Ben's 14-year-old daughter Wendy, offers Janey's son Mikey, played
wild-eyed by Elijah Wood, a sexual encounter, but with a condition.
She must be permitted to wear her large Nixon mask during it.  When her
father finds them in Janey's basement, he is almost rendered
speechless.  Afterall, he just left Janey's bed upstairs.
     In another scene, Wendy takes Mikey's younger brother Sandy,
played with devilish innocence by Adam Hann-Byrd, into the bathroom for
the classic game of you-show-me-yours-and-I'll-show-you-mine.  When
Janey finds them, she hypocritically delivers an overly long and obtuse
lecture to Wendy that includes the admonition, "A person's body is his
temple."  (Yes, "his" since the 1970s predate the political correctness
era.)
     All of the performances are tour de force, but incredibly
depressing.  The show offers only a few possibly redemptive scenes.
     The film's long ending sequence makes the picture.  As its title
suggests, it includes an ice storm.  During the storm the adults attend
a "California key party."  Like a grown-up version of spin-the-bottle,
each woman gets to go home with the man whose car keys she fishes out
of a big bowl.  Never has sex seemed more dismal that in this sad game
of spouse-swapping.  Even when the men get the worse looking ones at
the party, they awkwardly seem to jump for joy.  But THE ICE STORM is
never a comedy, not even a black comedy.  It is a deadly serious and
morose morality tale and the slowest and the darkest movie yet from Ang
Lee.  It is a devastating film that will almost certainly leave you
emotionally drained.
     THE ICE STORM runs 1:52.  It is rated R for drugs, sex and mature
themes.  The film would be fine for older and mature teenagers.  I
strongly recommend the picture to you and give it *** 1/2.
REVIEW WRITTEN ON: September 23, 1997
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.
